src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ############################## !
!This file contains the numerals !
! ############################## !




! Numerals
! ========

! The initial lexica
! ------------------



! Case forms of the basic digits
! ------------------------------

! 1-10

LEXICON AKTA
             :a%>   AKTA-NIE ;
             :a%>Q1 AKTA-OBL ;
+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K        ;

LEXICON AKTA-VOWELHARMONY
             :å%>   AKTA-NIE ;
             :å%>Q1 AKTA-OBL ;
+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K        ;

LEXICON AKTA-NIE
 +Sg+Nom:  K ;
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
    +Ess:n K ;

LEXICON AKTA-OBL
      +Sg+Gen:    K                ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:%>  NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Acc:v   K                ;
      +Sg+Ine:n   K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:s   K                ;
      +Sg+Com:jn  K                ;
      +Sg+Par:t   K                ;

 +Sg+Ill+Attr:    K                ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:n   K                ;
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:t   K                ;
 +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K                ;

      +Pl+Nom:    K                ;
      +Pl+Gen:j   K                ;
      +Pl+Acc:jt  K                ;
      +Pl+Ill:jda K                ;
      +Pl+Ine:jn  K                ;
      +Pl+Ela:js  K                ;
      +Pl+Com:j   K                ;
      
 
LEXICON ÅVTÅ
      +Sg+Gen:%>    K                ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>    K                ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:%>    NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Acc:%>v   K                ;
      +Sg+Ine:%>n   K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:%>s   K                ;
      +Sg+Com:%>jn  K                ;
      +Sg+Par:%>t   K                ;
      +Pl+Nom:%>    K                ;
      +Pl+Gen:%>j   K                ;
      +Pl+Acc:%>jt  K                ;
      +Pl+Ill:%>jda K                ;
      +Pl+Ine:%>jn  K                ;
      +Pl+Ela:%>js  K                ;
      +Pl+Com:%>j   K                ;

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-ÅVTÅ                 
 +Sg+Gen:%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:%> K ;                         
 +Cmp/SgGen:%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>v K ;            
 +Sg+Ine:%>n K ;            
 +Sg+Ela:%>s K ;            
! +Sg+Com:%>jn K ;           
 +Sg+Par:%>t K ;            

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTA                
 :a%>   ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-NIE ;               
 :a%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-OBL ;              
+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K        ;

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-NIE                
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;              
! +Ess:n K ;                 

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-OBL                
 +Sg+Gen:   K ;                           
 +Cmp/SgGen:%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Acc:v  K ;              
 +Sg+Ine:n  K ;              
 +Sg+Ela:s  K ;              
! +Sg+Com:jn K ;             
 +Sg+Par:t  K ;
 
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:       K ;   
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:n      K ;  
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:t      K ;  
! +Sg+Com+Attr:jn     K ;  
                  
! +Pl+Nom:    K ;                
! +Pl+Gen:j   K ;               
! +Pl+Acc:jt  K ;              
! +Pl+Ill:jda K ;             
! +Pl+Ine:jn  K ;              
! +Pl+Ela:js  K ;              
! +Pl+Com:j   K ;               

LEXICON GUOKTA 
                +Sg+Nom:a%>   K       ; !pred&attr   
+Use/Marg+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:e%>   K       ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized             
         +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:a%>   K       ; !dialect differences in whether it's guokta or guovtev in accusative
                +Sg+Ill:a%>j  K       ; !pred&attr     
                   +Ess:a%>n  K       ;  
   +Use/Marg+Ess+Use/NG:e%>n  K       ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized             
                       :e%>Q1 GUOVTE- ; !other cases (in weak grade)
                       :i%>Q1 GUOVTI- ; !plural     
          +Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K;
!+Sg+Gen:e%>Q1 K ; ! redundant, see GUOVTE-         
!+Sg+Gen:e%>Q1 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;  ! redundant, see GUOVTE-          
!  GUOKTA- ;                 

LEXICON GUOVTE- 
        +Sg+Acc:v  K                ;    
        +Sg+Gen:   K                ;   
       ! +Sg+Gen:%- #                ; ! outcommented because what is this?                       
        +Cmp/SgGen:   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; 
        +Sg+Ine:n  K                ; !pred&attr            
        +Sg+Ela:s  K                ; !pred&attr             
        +Sg+Par:t  K                ; !pred&attr  
        
   +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K                ; !only attr 
   +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K                ; !only attr 
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K                ; !only attr 
                    
        +Pl+Nom:   K                ;              
 
LEXICON GUOVTI-   
      +Sg+Com:jn  K ;
 +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K ;
          
 +Pl+Gen:j   K ;             
 +Pl+Acc:jt  K ;            
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;           
 +Pl+Ine:jn  K ;            
 +Pl+Ela:js  K ;            
 +Pl+Com:j   K ;             
         
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOKTA                
        ẈG-LÅK-GUOKTA- ; 
              :e%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTE- ;
 +Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K;
 !:i%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTI- ;               

!+Sg+Gen:a%>Q1 K ; !redunant         
!+Sg+Gen:a%>Q1 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; !redundant                

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOKTA- 
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:a%>   K ;             
!          +Ess:a%>n  K ;   
!   +Ess+Use/NG:e%>n  K ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTE- 
        +Sg+Acc:v     K ;           
        +Sg+Gen:      K ; 
        +Sg+Ill+Attr: K ;                       
        +Cmp/SgGen:      NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;   
        +Sg+Ine:n     K ;             
        +Sg+Ela:s     K ;             
        +Sg+Par:t     K ;    
        
!        +Sg+Gen:%- K ; ! ???            
 
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTI-   
! +Sg+Com:jn K ;                        
                
LEXICON GÅLMMÅ           
              :å%> GÅLMMÅ-NAIE ; !strong grade cases   
              :å%>Q1 GÅLMMÅ-OBL ; !weak grade cases  
 +Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K;
                        
LEXICON GÅLMMÅ-NAIE      
        +Sg+Nom:  K ;            
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:  K ;            
        +Sg+Ill:j K ;           
           +Ess:n K ;              
                         
LEXICON GÅLMMÅ-OBL 
        +Sg+Acc:v      K ;                 
        +Sg+Gen:       K ;                     
        +Cmp/SgGen:       NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; 
        +Sg+Ine:n      K ;           
        +Sg+Ela:s      K ;           
        +Sg+Com:jn     K ;          
        +Sg+Par:t      K ;  
  
   +Sg+Ill+Attr:       K ;  
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:n      K ;  
   +Sg+Ela+Attr:t      K ;  
   +Sg+Com+Attr:jn     K ;  
                 
        +Pl+Nom:       K ;            
        +Pl+Gen:j      K ;           
        +Pl+Acc:jt     K ;          
        +Pl+Ill:jda    K ;         
        +Pl+Ine:jn     K ;          
        +Pl+Ela:js     K ;          
        +Pl+Com:j      K ;           

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ
              :å%> ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-NAIE ;      
              :å%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;     
 +Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K ;
                        
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-NAIE      
        +Sg+Ill:j K ;           
!           +Ess:n K ; 
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:  K ;              
                         
