src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON 2TO9F
guokta+Num+CmpN/SgG:guokt GUOKTA ;
gålmmå+Num+CmpN/SgG:gålmm GÅLMMÅ ;
niellja+Num+CmpN/SgG:niellj GUOKTA ;
niellja+Num+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgG:nieljj GUOKTA ;
vihtta+Num+CmpN/SgG:vidá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;
guhtta+Num+CmpN/SgG:gudá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;
LEXICON LÅGENAN
lågenanakta+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#akt AKTA ;
lågenanakta+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#åvtå ÅVTÅ ;
lågenanguokta+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#guokt GUOKTA ;
lågenangålmmå+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#gålmm GÅLMMÅ ;
lågenanniellja+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#niellj GUOKTA ;
lågenanvihtta+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#vidá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;
lågenanguhtta+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#gudá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;
